Maine, session 132, LD1582.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §3102, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Closure device. "Closure device" means the part of a beverage container that
closes or seals the container. "Closure device" includes, but is not limited to, a cap, cover,
lid, cork, plug or similar device. A closure device does not need to be removable in order
for the contents of the beverage container to be consumed.